District of Columbia statutes.
50-301.16

Reporting by Commissioner.

(a)

Within 12 months of March 25, 1986, the Commissioner shall make a report to the Mayor and the Council and shall recommend changes in the areas of taxicab insurance the Commissioner considers necessary for the protection of the public and the public interest in taxi transportation.

(b)

The report shall contain the views of the Commission on recommendations made by the Commissioner.

(c)

The report shall include recommendations relating to:

(1)

The appropriate amounts of minimum insurance taxicabs should be required to carry, including an analysis of the economic impact on the taxi industry of a raise in minimum amounts;

(2)

The appropriateness and feasibility of extending insurance coverage on taxicabs to include collision and other coverage, and an analysis of the economic impact of extending insurance coverage; and

(3)

The current practices of the taxi industry in the area of insurance.

Mar. 25, 1986, D.C. Law 6-97, § 17, 33 DCR 703
May 21, 1997, D.C. Law 11-268, § 10(ii)(2), 44 DCR 1730
1981 Ed., § 40-1716.
2001 Ed., § 50-316.